Indiana, session 2026, SB271.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-37.5-1-0.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.7. (a) As used in this chapter,
"telecommunications network wire" means:
(1) fiber; and
(2) cable consisting of six (6) or more twisted pairs of wire,
with or without sheathing;
used in wireline or wireless communications service.
(b) The term includes wire described in subsection (a) from
which the protective coating has been removed by smelting,
burning, or melting.
SECTION 2. IC 25-37.5-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.222-2013,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) When used in this chapter, "valuable metal"
means any product made of metal that readily may be resold. The term:
(1) includes metal bossies, telecommunications network wire,
and small component motor vehicle parts; and
(2) does not include the following:
(A) A beverage can.
(B) Used jewelry regulated under IC 24-4-13.
(C) Precious metal regulated under IC 24-4-19.
SEA 271 — CC 1

2
(b) As used in this chapter, "valuable metal dealer" means any
individual, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or partnership
engaged in the business of purchasing and reselling valuable metal
either at a permanently established place of business or in connection
with a business of an itinerant nature, including junk shops, junk yards,
junk stores, auto wreckers, scrap metal dealers or processors, salvage
yards, collectors of or dealers in junk, and junk cars or trucks. The term
includes a core buyer. The term does not include a person who
purchases a vehicle and obtains title to the vehicle.
(c) As used in this chapter, "purchase" means acquiring a valuable
metal product for a consideration, but does not include purchases
between scrap metal processing facilities (as defined in IC 8-23-1-36).
SECTION 3. IC 25-37.5-1-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.70-2021,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) A valuable metal dealer who fails to comply
with this chapter commits a Class A infraction. In addition, the
valuable metal dealer may be subject to a criminal penalty under
IC 35-43-4-3.3.
(b) A valuable metal dealer who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally fails to comply with this chapter;
and
(2) purchases stolen valuable metal;
commits concealing a valuable metal purchase, a Level 6 felony.
SECTION 4. IC 25-37.5-1-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. A person may not sell or
attempt to sell, and a valuable metal dealer may not purchase or
attempt to purchase, telecommunications network wire in any
amount, unless:
(1) the seller is an authorized agent, representative, or
employee of a telecommunications provider, broadband
provider, or public utility;
(2) the seller:
(A) is authorized by the state to conduct business in
Indiana;
(B) is an employee or authorized agent of a business that,
in the normal course of operations, handles salvaged
telecommunications network wire, including building
contractors and demolition firms; and
(C) presents to the valuable metal dealer for inspection a
valid certificate of existence or good standing issued by the
state of Indiana;
SEA 271 — CC 1

3
(3) the seller holds an amateur radio service license issued by
the Federal Communications Commission under 47 CFR,
Part 97; or
(4) the seller is a retail seller that possesses a bill of sale,
purchase receipt, or certificate of ownership signed by an
employee of a telecommunications company stating that the
seller is the lawful owner of the telecommunications network
wire. This certificate of ownership must be provided on the
telecommunications company's business letterhead and must
provide the date on which the telecommunications network
wire was acquired by the seller and a description of how the
telecommunications network wire was acquired. A valuable
metal dealer that purchases telecommunications network wire
under this subdivision must maintain an electronic copy of the
bill of sale, purchase receipt, or certificate of ownership
provided by the retail seller for two (2) years.
SECTION 5. IC 34-24-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.276-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. If a person has an unpaid claim on a liability
that is covered by IC 24-4.6-5 or suffers a pecuniary loss as a result of
a violation of IC 25-37.5, IC 35-43, IC 35-42-3-3, IC 35-42-3-4,
IC 35-45-9, or IC 35-46-10, the person may bring a civil action against
the person who caused the loss for the following:
(1) An amount not to exceed three (3) times:
(A) the actual damages of the person suffering the loss, in the
case of a liability that is not covered by IC 24-4.6-5; or
(B) the total pump price of the motor fuel received, in the case
of a liability that is covered by IC 24-4.6-5.
(2) The costs of the action.
(3) A reasonable attorney's fee.
(4) Actual travel expenses that are not otherwise reimbursed
under subdivisions (1) through (3) and are incurred by the person
suffering loss to:
(A) have the person suffering loss or an employee or agent of
that person file papers and attend court proceedings related to
the recovery of a judgment under this chapter; or
(B) provide witnesses to testify in court proceedings related to
the recovery of a judgment under this chapter.
(5) A reasonable amount to compensate the person suffering loss
for time used to:
(A) file papers and attend court proceedings related to the
recovery of a judgment under this chapter; or
SEA 271 — CC 1

4
(B) travel to and from activities described in clause (A).
(6) Actual direct and indirect expenses incurred by the person
suffering loss to compensate employees and agents for time used
to:
(A) file papers and attend court proceedings related to the
recovery of a judgment under this chapter; or
(B) travel to and from activities described in clause (A).
(7) All other reasonable costs of collection.
SECTION 6. IC 35-31.5-2-264.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 264.3. "Purchase", for purposes
of IC 35-43-4-3.3, has the meaning set forth in IC 25-37.5-1-1.
SECTION 7. IC 35-31.5-2-345.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 345.5. "Valuable metal", for
purposes of IC 35-43-4-3.3, has the meaning set forth in
IC 25-37.5-1-1.
SECTION 8. IC 35-31.5-2-345.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 345.6. "Valuable metal dealer",
for purposes of IC 35-43-4-3.3, has the meaning set forth in
IC 25-37.5-1-1.
SECTION 9. IC 35-43-4-3.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.3. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
this section:
(1) "Purchase" has the meaning set forth in IC 25-37.5-1-1.
(2) "Valuable metal" has the meaning set forth in
IC 25-37.5-1-1.
(3) "Valuable metal dealer" has the meaning set forth in
IC 25-37.5-1-1.
(b) A valuable metal dealer who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally fails to comply with
IC 25-37.5-1; and
(2) purchases stolen valuable metal;
commits concealing a valuable metal purchase, a Level 6 felony.
SECTION 10. IC 35-52-25-61.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 61.5. IC 25-37.5-1-7 defines a crime concerning
valuable metal dealers.
SEA 271 — CC 1

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 271 — CC 1